Washington statutes.
RCW 19.72.180

Successive recoveries on bond—Limitation.

In the event of the breach of the condition of any bond described in RCW 19.72.109, successive recoveries may be made thereon by any of the obligees thereof: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the total amount of all such recoveries, whether by one or more of such obligees, shall not exceed, in the aggregate, the penal sum specified in such bond.

[ 1959 c 113 s 1.]